apertium-pl-dsb.dsb.metadix
    <pardef n="mache/ta__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ty</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śe</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tu</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śe</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śe</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>towu</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>toma</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>śe</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>toma</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>toma</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ty</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tow</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tam</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ty</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tami</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tach</l>
          <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="žon/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owu</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oma</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oma</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oma</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ru/ka__BASE">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kowu</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koma</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koma</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>koma</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kow</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kam</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kami</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kach</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ru/ka__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ka<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ru/ka__BASE"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pjaka/ŕ__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>ŕ<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ru/ka__BASE"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Angolanaŕ"><i>Angolana</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="Babylonijaŕ"><i>Babylonija</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="běgaŕ"><i>běga</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="bogaprějaŕ"><i>bogaprěja</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="Brjazaŕ"><i>Brjaza</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="cazaŕ"><i>caza</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="chytaŕ"><i>chyta</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="diabetikaŕ"><i>diabetika</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="Drježdźanaŕ"><i>Drježdźana</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="elektronikaŕ"><i>elektronika</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="Frankobrodaŕ"><i>Frankobroda</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="Górjanaŕ"><i>Górjana</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="Hebrejaŕ"><i>Hebreja</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="kamjenjaŕ"><i>kamjenja</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="kritikaŕ"><i>kritika</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="Limbargaŕ"><i>Limbarga</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="Łukowaŕ"><i>Łukowa</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="metodikaŕ"><i>metodika</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="Myanmaraŕ"><i>Myanmara</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="njeplěwaŕ"><i>njeplěwa</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="policajaŕ"><i>policaja</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="póžywaŕ"><i>póžywa</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="pśemóžaŕ"><i>pśemóža</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="pśirucaŕ"><i>pśiruca</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="Rogeńcaŕ"><i>Rogeńca</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="sanitetaŕ"><i>saniteta</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="sinfonikaŕ"><i>sinfonika</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="sobuskjaržbaŕ"><i>sobuskjaržba</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="šturlowaŕ"><i>šturlowa</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="troštowaŕ"><i>troštowa</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="wjedraŕ"><i>wjedra</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="wolontaŕ"><i>wolonta</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="wuformowaŕ"><i>wuformowa</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="wuzgónjowaŕ"><i>wuzgónjowa</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="zastaraŕ"><i>zastara</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="znicaŕ"><i>znica</i><par n="pjaka/ŕ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="žona"><i>žon</i><par n="žon/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Blunjanarka"><i>Blunjanar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Frizowka"><i>Frizow</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Rogeńcarka"><i>Rogeńcar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aktowka"><i>aktow</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asistenka"><i>asisten</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baskowka"><i>baskow</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brigaděrka"><i>brigaděr</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chromatika"><i>chromati</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dialektika"><i>dialekti</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eklektikarka"><i>eklektikar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="entertainerka"><i>entertainer</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filmoteka"><i>filmote</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="garbowarka"><i>garbowar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gramatika"><i>gramati</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ilustratorka"><i>ilustrator</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klientka"><i>klient</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kritikarka"><i>kritikar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="linguistika"><i>linguisti</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mjazyplatka"><i>mjazyplat</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="muka"><i>mu</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naturalistka"><i>naturalist</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oboistka"><i>oboist</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pianistka"><i>pianist</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="programěrarka"><i>programěrar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pěškarka"><i>pěškar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="randalěrarka"><i>randalěrar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="romanika"><i>romani</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sebjekritika"><i>sebjekriti</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sopranistka"><i>sopranist</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stonožka"><i>stonož</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tektonika"><i>tektoni</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="winicarka"><i>winicar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wrośarka"><i>wrośar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wósymźasetka"><i>wósymźaset</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zawězka"><i>zawěz</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šaparka"><i>šapar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ženjarka"><i>ženjar</i><par n="ru/ka__n"/></e>
